Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 45

Artisan's and Repairmen's Liens

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates.

Acts 1899, No. 58, § 4: effective on passage.

18-45-101. Right of mechanics and artisans to sell personalty held for debt.

(a)

All mechanics and artisans who are in possession of articles of personal property, and hold them by virtue of a lien thereon for labor and material, shall have a right to sell them for the satisfaction of the debt for which the property is held.

(b)

Lienholders shall give a bond in the sum to be fixed by a circuit court with proper jurisdiction before they shall proceed to sell, by proceeding in accordance with the requirements of this section.

(c)(1)

The sale shall not take place until the expiration of thirty (30) days from the time the work is completed.

(2)(A)

If the debt is not paid at the end of that time, it shall be the duty of the lienholder, not less than ten (10) days before making the sale, to post up a written notice of the proposed sale at or near the front of his or her place of business, or, in case he or she has no place of business, at five (5) of the most public places in the township.

(B)

This notice of the proposed sale shall specify the property to be sold, the name of the owner or debtor, and the time and place of sale.

(C)

The notice shall be signed by the lienholder.

(d)

At the sale, which shall be at public auction for cash, the lienholder shall have the right to bid not less than the amount of his or her debt. In case the property sells for more than the amount due, he or she shall pay over the surplus on demand to the person entitled thereto.

(e)

In case the place of residence or post office address of the debtor is known to the lienholder, it shall be his or her duty, besides giving the notice as required in subsection (c) of this section, to make demand for the debt before making the sale, either in person or by letter.

(f)

In all the lienholder's dealings with the property held by him or her, the lienholder shall act in good faith with the debtor and shall be responsible for any abuse of the powers and authority vested in him or her by the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 1899, No. 58, §§ 1-3, p. 108; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6875-6877; Pope's Dig., §§ 8831-8833; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-401 — 51-403; Acts 2017, No. 299, § 2; 2017, No. 757, § 6.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 299 substituted “circuit court with proper jurisdiction” for “justice of the peace or circuit judge” in (b).

The 2017 amendment by No. 757 deleted “justice of the peace or” preceding “circuit judge” in (b).

Cross References.

Mechanics liens, §18-44-101 et seq.

Subchapter 2

— Blacksmiths, Vehicle Repairmen, Etc.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1919, No. 140, § 10: Feb. 27, 1919. Emergency declared.

Acts 1923, No. 252, § 2: effective 90 days after adjournment of legislature.

Acts 1953, No. 77, § 2: approved Feb. 17, 1953. Emergency clause provided: “This act being necessary for the protection of the public peace, health and safety, shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1963, No. 112, § 2: Feb. 28, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is no procedure by which a motor vehicle repairman who has surrendered possession of a repaired motor vehicle may enforce a lien against such vehicle when it is owned by a nonresident of the State of Arkansas; that the lack of such procedure is depriving motor repairmen of the remedy afforded them against residents of this State, and that enactment of this bill will alleviate this situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 695, § 5: Mar. 17, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that current laws regarding blacksmiths' liens and liens of vehicle repairmen are vague and indefinite in certain applications; that the vagueness of those laws results in disagreement and litigation; that this act is designed to clarify such laws and should be given effect immediately to avoid further confusion and disagreement. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

18-45-201. Right to absolute lien.

All blacksmiths, horseshoers, wheelwrights, automobile repairmen, airplane repairmen, machine shops, farm implement repairmen, automotive storagemen, firms, and corporations who perform, or have performed, work or labor for any person, firm, or corporation, who have furnished any materials or parts for the repair of any vehicle or farm implement, including tires and all other motor accessories and bodies for automobiles, trucks, tractors, airplanes, and all other motor propelling conveyances, or who store on their premises any automobile, truck, tractor, airplane, or other automotive vehicle, if unpaid, shall have an absolute lien upon the product or object of their labor, repair, or storage and upon all wagons, carriages, automobiles, trucks, tractors, airplanes, farm implements, and other articles repaired or stored and all horses or other animals shod by them, for the sums of money due for their work, labor, storage, and for materials furnished by them and used in the product, the shoeing and repairing, including the furnishing of tires and all other accessories and bodies for automobiles, trucks, tractors, airplanes, and all other motor-propelled vehicles.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 140, § 1, p. 123; C. & M. Dig., § 6866; Pope's Dig., § 8822; Acts 1963, No. 159, § 1; 1965, No. 458, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-404.

Cross References.

Liens for motor vehicle storage, §18-48-401 et seq.

Liens on animals, §§18-48-101 et seq.,18-48-201 et seq.,18-48-301 et seq.

18-45-202. Priority of lien.

(a)

The lien provided for in this subchapter shall take precedence over, and be superior to, any mortgage or other obligation attaching against the property in all cases in which the holder of the mortgage or other obligation shall permit the property to remain in the possession of and be used by the person owing and bound for the amount thereof.

(b)

The lien provided for in this subchapter shall be subject to the perfected lien of a financial institution or vendor of automobiles, trucks, tractors, and all other motor-propelled conveyances for any claim for balance of purchase money due thereon.

(c)

The lien shall not take precedence over a bona fide purchaser for value of any automobile, truck, tractor, and other motor-propelled conveyances without either actual or constructive notice.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 140, § 9, p. 123; C. & M. Dig., § 6874; Pope's Dig., § 8830; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-412; Acts 1999, No. 695, § 1.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment, in (b), inserted “perfected” following “subject to the,” inserted “financial institution or” preceding “vendor,” and deleted “retaining title therein” following “conveyances.”

18-45-203. Right of sale.

Any person, firm, or corporation having a lien under the provisions of this subchapter and retaining possession of the wagon, carriage, automobile, truck, tractor, airplane, motor-propelled conveyance, or other article repaired, or on horses or other animals shod by them, by virtue of the lien thereon for labor or materials, shall have the right to sell those items for the satisfaction of the debt for which the property is held.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 140, § 2, p. 123; C. & M. Dig., § 6867; Pope's Dig., § 8823; Acts 1963, No. 159, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-405.

18-45-204. Procedure for sale of property possessed by lienholder.

(a)(1)

The sale shall not take place until the expiration of thirty (30) days from the time the work is completed.

(2)(A)

If the debt is not paid at the end of that time, it shall be the duty of the lienholder, not less than ten (10) days before making the sale, to post up written notice of the proposed sale at or near the front door of his or her place of business and at least five (5) other of the most public places in the township.

(B)

This written notice of the proposed sale shall specify the property to be sold, the name of the owner or debtor, the time and place of sale, and shall be signed by the lienholder.

(b)(1)

At the sale, which shall be at public auction for cash to the highest and best bidder, the lienholder shall have the right to bid not less than the amount of his or her debt.

(2)

In case the property sells for more than the amount of the debt, the lienholder shall pay over the surplus on demand to the person entitled thereto after deducting the amount of his or her debt and the actual cost of the sale.

(c)

It shall be the duty of the lienholder, besides giving notice as required in subsection (a) of this section, to make demand for the debt before making the sale by registered letter addressed to the last known residence or post office address of the debtor.

(d)

In the lienholder's dealings with the property held by him or her, the lienholder shall act in good faith with the debtor and shall be responsible for any abuse of the power and authority vested in him or her by the provisions of this subchapter.

(e)

The provisions of §27-50-1101 shall govern sales of vehicles subject to the registration laws of this state.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 140, §§ 3, 4, p. 123; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6868, 6869; Pope's Dig., §§ 8824, 8825; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-406, 51-407; Acts 1997, No. 841, § 5.

18-45-205. Filing of notice and bond required.

(a)(1)

The lienholder shall file with a circuit court having jurisdiction a notice under §18-45-204 to be posted.

(2)

The circuit court shall note in the notice the amount of a bond, for the protection of the debtor or property owner, if the lienholder is not entitled to the lien and for the payment of damages if the sale is wrongfully made.

(b)

The lienholder shall file a bond so conditioned and in such sum with the circuit court, and the surety thereon shall be approved by the circuit court before making the sale under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 140, § 5, p. 123; C. & M. Dig., § 6870; Pope's Dig., § 8826; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-408; Acts 2017, No. 299, § 3; 2017, No. 757, § 7.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 299 substituted “the circuit court having jurisdiction” for “one (1) of the justices of the peace in the township” in (a)(1); substituted “circuit court” for “justice” in (a)(2); and substituted “circuit court” for “justice of the peace” twice in (b).

The 2017 amendment by No. 757 substituted “a court having jurisdiction a notice under” for “one (1) of the justices of the peace in the township where his or her place of business is located a notice similar to the ones required in” in (a)(1); in (a)(2), substituted “The court” for “The justice”, “in” for “upon”, and “if” for “in the event”; in (b), substituted “court” for “justice of the peace” twice and “under” for “provided for in” once; and made stylistic changes.

18-45-206. Filing of lien when lienholder parts with possession.

(a)(1)

If the lienholder has voluntarily parted with possession of any property upon which he or she has a lien under the provisions of this subchapter, he or she may still avail himself or herself of the lien within one hundred twenty (120) days after the work or labor is done or performed or materials furnished.

(2)

This may be done by filing with the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which the debtor resides, or, if the debtor is a nonresident of this state, then with the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which the property is located at the time of the filing, a just and true itemized account for the demand due, after allowing all credits, containing a description of the property to be charged with the lien and verified by the affidavit of the lienholder.

(b)

The time set out in this section for filing liens shall apply only to motor-propelled vehicles and shall not affect the time for filing liens in other cases as now provided by law.

(c)

The clerk of the circuit court shall file the account and make an abstract of it in the book of minutes of mortgages and deeds of trust of personal property, for which he or she shall charge a fee of twenty-five cents (25¢), to be paid by the person filing the account.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 140, §§ 6, 7, p. 123; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6871, 6872; Pope's Dig., §§ 8827, 8828; Acts 1961, No. 462, § 1; 1963, No. 112, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-409, 51-410.

18-45-207. Suits to enforce liens — Attachment.

(a)

Liens accruing under this subchapter may be enforced at any time within eighteen (18) months after the accounts are filed by suits in the circuit or district court.

(b)(1)

If the lienholder has parted with possession of any property upon which he or she claims a lien under the provisions of §18-45-201, he or she may, at the time of institution of his or her suit, have a specific attachment of the property upon which he or she claims the lien by praying for it in his or her complaint and by providing bond in the manner and amount as otherwise provided by law for attachment.

(2)

The establishment of a valid lien at the hearing of the cause shall be grounds for sustaining the attachment.

History.

Acts 1919, No. 140, § 8, p. 123; C. & M. Dig., § 6873; Acts 1923, No. 252, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 8829; Acts 1951, No. 271, § 1; 1953, No. 77, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-411; Acts 2003, No. 1185, § 253.

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment, in (a), substituted “circuit or district court” for “chancery” and deleted “courts of the county, or in the municipal courts of the counties having such courts, or by justices of the peace of the township in which the action would accrue in counties having no municipal courts” in the first sentence and deleted the second sentence.

Subchapter 3

— Electrical Repairmen

18-45-301. Right of lien.

Any person, firm, or corporation engaged in the business of repairing, rewinding, or rebuilding of electric motors, transformers, generators, and other electrical equipment who shall perform any work or labor on any object, thing, material, or property in connection with the businesses mentioned in this section shall have an absolute lien on the object, thing, material, or property for the full amount of the work or labor done or performed and material furnished.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 61, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-413.

18-45-302. Lien priority.

If any person, firm, or corporation entitled to a lien under the provisions of this subchapter shall notify, by registered mail at the last known place of address, any person, firm, or corporation holding a mortgage or a lien against the property before the work or labor is done, and within ten (10) days after mailing the notice receives no response or objection to the performance of the work or labor, then, in that event, the lien provided for in this subchapter shall take precedence over, and be superior to, any mortgage or lien held by any person so notified who makes no objection to the performance of the work or labor.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 61, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-416.

18-45-303. Right of sale.

Any person, firm, or corporation having a lien under the provisions of §18-45-301 and retaining possession of the object, thing, or property serviced or repaired shall have the right to sell it for the satisfaction of the lien.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 61, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-414.

Cross References.

Notice of sale under laborer's lien, §§18-43-107,18-43-108.

18-45-304. Selling of property kept by lienholder.

(a)(1)

The sale shall not take place until the expiration of ninety (90) days from the time the work is completed.

(2)

If the debt is not paid at the end of that time, it shall be the duty of the lienholder, not less than ten (10) days before making the sale, to address a letter by registered mail to the last known place of address of the owner of the property or the person who ordered the property repaired.

(3)

In addition, the lienholder shall give notice of the time and place and terms of sale in the same manner as now provided by law for the giving of notice for sale of property under labor liens.

(b)(1)

The property may then be sold at public auction for cash to the highest and best bidder. The lienholder shall have the right to bid not less than the amount of his or her debt.

(2)

If the property sells for more than the amount of the debt, the lienholder shall be liable for, and shall pay, any surplus to the person entitled thereto, after deducting the amount of his or her debt and the actual costs of the sale.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 61, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-414.

18-45-305. Enforcement of lien if possession not retained.

(a)

If the lienholder has voluntarily parted with possession of any property upon which he or she has a lien under the provisions of this subchapter, he or she may still avail himself or herself of a lien by filing a just and true itemized account within ninety (90) days after the work or labor is performed or material furnished with the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which the property is located.

(b)

The clerk of the circuit court shall file the account and make an abstract of it in the proper lien record book, and the clerk may charge a fee of twenty-five cents (25¢) for the service.

(c)(1)

The lien provided for in this subchapter may be enforced at any time within ninety (90) days after the filing of the lien.

(2)

The enforcement of such liens shall be by suits in the circuit court of the county in which the property is located.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 61, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-415.

Subchapter 4

— Cleaners, Launderers, Etc.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1939, No. 98, § 7: approved Feb. 17, 1939. Emergency declared.

18-45-401. Absolute lien.

Cleaners, launderers, dyers, tailors, hat renovators, and shoe repairers, whether individuals, firms, or corporations, who perform work and labor on any object, thing, material, or property shall have an absolute lien on the object, thing, material, or property for the labor done and performed for the sum of money due for the work and labor.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 98, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-417.

18-45-402. Priority.

(a)

The lien provided for in this subchapter shall take precedence over, or be superior to, any mortgage or other obligation attaching against the property in all cases in which the holder of the mortgage or other obligation shall permit the property to remain in the possession and be used by the person owing and bound for the amount thereof.

(b)

The lien shall not take precedence over a bona fide purchaser for value of any such property without either actual or constructive notice.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 98, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-422.

18-45-403. Right to sell.

Any person, firm, or corporation having a lien under the provisions of this subchapter and retaining possession of the object, thing, material, or property serviced or repaired by them shall have the right to sell it for the satisfaction of the lien subject to the provisions of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 98, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-418.

18-45-404. Proceedings to sell property retained by lienholder.

(a)(1)

The sale shall not take place until the expiration of ninety (90) days from the time the work is completed.

(2)(A)

If the debt is not paid at the end of that time, it shall be the duty of the lienholder, not less than ten (10) days before making the sale, to post up written notice of the proposed sale at or near the front door of his or her place of business.

(B)

This written notice of the proposed sale shall specify the property to be sold, the name of the debtor, and the time and place of sale. The sale shall be at public auction for cash to the highest and best bidder.

(b)

The lienholder shall have the right to bid not less than the amount of his or her debt. In case the property sells for more than the amount of the debt, the lienholder shall pay over any surplus on demand to the person entitled thereto, after deducting the amount of his or her debt and the actual cost of the sale.

(c)

It shall be the duty of the lienholder, besides giving notice as required in subsection (a) of this section, to make demand for the debt before making the sale by registered letter addressed to the last known residence or post office of the debtor.

(d)

In the lienholder's dealings with the property held by him or her, the lienholder shall act in good faith to the debtor.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 98, §§ 3, 4; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-419, 51-420.

18-45-405. Filing and enforcing when lienholder not in possession.

(a)(1)

If the lienholder has voluntarily parted with possession of any property upon which he or she has a lien under the provisions of this subchapter, he or she may still avail himself or herself of the lien within ninety (90) days after the work or labor is done or performed, or materials furnished.

(2)

This may be done by filing, with the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which the debtor resides, a just and true itemized account for the demand due after allowing all credits and containing a description of the property to be charged with the lien, verified by the affidavit of the lienholder.

(b)(1)

The clerk of the circuit court shall file the account and make an abstract of it in the book of minutes or mortgages and deeds of trust of personal property.

(2)

For this the clerk shall charge a fee of twenty-five cents (25¢) to be paid by the person filing the account and the fee shall be a part of the costs of the enforcement of the lien.

(c)

Liens as provided by this section may be enforced at any time within four (4) months after the accounts are filed, by suits in the circuit courts of the county. The cause shall proceed to judgment and final disposition as other matters of equitable cognizance and jurisdiction.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 98, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-421.